Maine, session 132, LD287.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §710 is enacted to read:
§710. Safety and interconnectivity requirements of construction projects
1. Safety and interconnectivity requirements for construction projects over
$500,000. A construction project under this chapter, the design of which is commenced on
or after January 1, 2026 and the cost of which is $500,000 or more, must:
A. Identify locations on state highways and state aid highways affected by the
construction project that:
(1) Do not have a complete sidewalk or shared-use path that meets the requirements
of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990;
(2) Do not have bicycle facilities in the form of a bicycle lane or adjacent parallel
trail or shared-use path;
(3) Have a sidewalk, bicycle lane, adjacent parallel trail or shared-use path within
a population center with a posted speed limit of over 30 miles per hour and no
buffer or physical separation from motor vehicle traffic and a pedestrian, bicyclist
or other user not in a motor vehicle; and
(4) Have a design that impedes the ability of a motorist to see a crossing pedestrian,
bicyclist or other user not in a motor vehicle with sufficient time to stop within the
posted speed limit and roadway configuration;
B. Consult with municipalities in which the project is being constructed to:
(1) Confirm existing or planned connections with other transportation
infrastructure along or across the construction project;
(2) Identify any connections of the construction project to existing and planned
public transportation services, including commuter and passenger rail and airports;
(3) Identify the existing and planned facility types for public transportation services
under subparagraph (2) within the municipality; and
(4) Consider use of speed management techniques to minimize crash exposure and
severity on a roadway located within the construction project;
C. In order to maintain a safe transportation system and to eliminate serious and fatal
motor vehicle crashes, adjust a posted speed limit on a roadway located within the
construction project to a lower speed with appropriate modifications to roadway design
and management operations to achieve the desired operating speed in a location where
the modifications align with local plans or ordinances and in particular that presents a
higher possibility of serious injury or a fatal motor vehicle crash occurring based upon
land use, observed crash data, crash potential or roadway characteristics that are likely
to increase crash exposure; and
D. Plan, design and construct facilities providing context-sensitive solutions that
contribute to transportation network connectivity and safety for pedestrians, bicyclists,
other users not in a motor vehicle and persons accessing public transportation and other
modal transportation connections, including sidewalks or shared-use paths that meet
the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, bicycle
Page 1 - 132LR0347(01)

412 facilities and crossings of the project as needed to integrate a state highway or state aid
423 highway into the local transportation system.
2. Emergency work. A construction project to perform repairs or construction
required to reopen a state highway or state aid highway due to a natural disaster or other
emergency is exempt from the requirements of this section.
3. Ongoing maintenance. Ongoing maintenance of facilities and systems of a
construction project under this section after construction is completed must be conducted
as provided under this chapter.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §711 is enacted to read:
§711. Priorities for state funding
1. Priority for funding. The department shall prioritize for funding under this Title a
transportation construction project or other recipient that meets the criteria of subsection 2.
2. Criteria. The criteria for priority of funding under subsection 1 include that the
project:
A. Provides street access for all transportation system users, including pedestrians,
bicyclists, other users not in a motor vehicle and users of public transportation;
B. Encourages mixed land use by constructing residences, offices, schools, parks,
shops, restaurants and other types of land use near each other;
C. Encourages infill development by building on empty or underutilized lots that have
access to public water, sewer and emergency services;
D. Facilitates access to affordable or dense housing;
E. Encourages walkable neighborhoods;
F. Preserves open space, wetlands, parks, farms and woodlands; and
G. Encourages robust community and public participation, opinions and input in the
type and scope of the transportation construction or other project.